Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-948
Subject's rights; independent evaluation and assistance in proceedings; fees and expenses.

A subject or the subject's counsel shall have the right to employ mental health professionals of his or her choice to independently evaluate the subject's mental condition and testify for and otherwise assist the subject in proceedings under the Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act or the Sex Offender Commitment Act. If the subject is indigent, only one such person may be employed except with leave of the mental health board. Any person so employed by a subject determined by the board to be indigent, except a subject represented by the public defender or county conflict counsel as defined in section 29-3934, shall apply to the board for expenses reasonably necessary to such person's effective assistance of the subject and for reasonable fees for services performed by such person in assisting the subject. The board shall then fix reasonable fees and expenses, and the county board shall allow payment to such person in the full amount fixed by the board.

Laws 1976, LB 806, § 62;

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 161;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 83-1052;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 68;

Laws 2006, LB 1199, § 44;

Laws 2026, LB965, § 45.
July 18, 2026
Sex Offender Commitment Act, see section 71-1201.